Utah statutes.
63G-3-302.   Public hearings.

(1)  Each agency may hold a public hearing on a proposed rule, amendment to a rule, or repeal of a rule during the public comment period.

(2)  Each agency shall hold a public hearing on a proposed rule, amendment to a rule, or repeal of a rule if:

(a)  a public hearing is required by state or federal mandate;

(b) (i)  another state agency, 10 interested persons, or an interested association having not fewer than 10 members request a public hearing; and

(ii)  the agency receives the request in writing not more than 15 days after the publication date of the proposed rule.

(3)  The agency shall hold the hearing:

(a)  before the rule becomes effective; and

(b)  no less than seven days nor more than 30 days after receipt of the request for hearing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

